Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2431.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state treasurer; distribution; Yavapai county; consolidated elections facility; matching monies; exemption A. The sum of $15,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state treasurer to distribute to Yavapai county for a consolidated elections facility. B. The state treasurer may distribute the monies appropriated in subsection A of this section only if Yavapai county commits in writing to provide at least fifty percent in matching monies of the total capital costs of the consolidated elections facility. C. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations, until June 30, 2029.